Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-163
Person with developmental disabilities; access to records; conditions.

For the purpose of protecting the human and legal rights of a person with developmental disabilities, the protection and advocacy system shall be granted access to the records, by any person or entity having possession or control of such records, of a person with developmental disabilities who resides in a facility for persons with developmental disabilities if (1) a complaint has been received by the protection and advocacy system from the legal guardian of such person or (2) a complaint has been received by the protection and advocacy system from or on behalf of such person and such person does not have a legal guardian or the state or the designee of the state is the legal guardian of such person.

Laws 1988, LB 697, § 3.